hu: Hangszercsatlakozó típusa: 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Vezeték nélküli adó (beépített); XLR; Egyéb
ru: Тип выходного разъема (инструмент): 1/4 дюйма (6,35 мм); 3,5 мм (1/8 дюйма); RCA; USB; Беспроводной передатчик (встроенный); XLR; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta izlaznog priključka (instrument): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Bežični odašiljač (ugrađen); XLR; Ostalo
cs: Typ výstupního konektoru (nástroj): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Bezdrátový vysílač (vestavěný); XLR; Ostatní
de: Typ der Ausgangsbuchse (Instrument): 1/4 Zoll (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 Zoll); Cinch (RCA); USB; Drahtlos-Sender (integriert); XLR; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta izhodnega priključka za instrument: 6,35 mm (1/4 in); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Brezžični oddajnik (vgrajen); XLR; Drugo
vi: Loại giắc cắm đầu ra (nhạc cụ): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Bộ phát không dây (tích hợp); XLR; Khác
it: Tipo di jack di uscita (strumento): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Trasmettitore wireless (integrato); XLR; Altro
lt-LT: Išvesties lizdo tipas (instrumento): 1/4 col. (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 col.); RCA; USB; Belaidis siųstuvas (įmontuotas); XLR; Kita
pl: Typ gniazda wyjściowego (instrumentalnego): 1/4 cala (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 cala); RCA; USB; Nadajnik bezprzewodowy (wbudowany); XLR; Inne
th: ประเภทแจ็คเอาต์พุต (เครื่องดนตรี): 1/4 นิ้ว (6.35 มม.); 3.5 มม. (1/8 นิ้ว); RCA; USB; ตัวส่งสัญญาณไร้สาย (ในตัว); XLR; อื่นๆ
en: Output jack type (instrument): 1/4 in (6.35 mm); 3.5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Wireless transmitter (built-in); XLR; Other
fr: Type de prise de sortie (instrument): 6,35 mm (1/4 po); 3,5 mm (1/8 po); RCA; USB; Transmetteur sans fil (intégré); XLR; Autre
da: Type af outputjack (instrument): 1/4 tomme (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8"); RCA; USB; Trådløs sender (indbygget); XLR; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de saída (instrumento): 1/4 pol. (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 pol.); RCA; USB; Transmissor sem fios (integrado); XLR; Outro
zh-CN: 输出插孔类型（乐器）: 1/4 英寸（6.35 毫米）; 3.5 毫米（1/8 英寸）; RCA; USB; 无线发射器（内置）; XLR; 其他
tr: Çıkış jakı tipi (enstrüman): 1/4 inç (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 inç); RCA; USB; Kablosuz verici (yerleşik); XLR; Diğer
ja: 出力ジャックのタイプ（楽器）: 1/4 インチ (6.35 mm); 3.5 mm (1/8 インチ); RCA; USB; ワイヤレストランスミッター (内蔵); XLR; その他
sk-SK: Typ výstupného konektora (nástroj): 1/4 palca (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 palca); RCA; USB; Bezdrôtový vysielač (vstavaný); XLR; Iné
ko: 출력 잭 유형(악기): 1/4인치(6.35mm); 3.5mm(1/8인치); RCA; USB; 무선 송신기(내장형); XLR; 기타
nb: Utgangskontakttype (instrument): 1/4 tommer (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 tommer); RCA; USB; Trådløs sender (innebygd); XLR; Annet
nl: Output jack type (instrument): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Draadloze zender (ingebouwd); XLR; Overige
sv: Utgångstyp (instrument): 1/4 tum (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 tum); RCA; USB; Trådlös sändare (inbyggd); XLR; Övrigt
fi: Ulostuloliittimen tyyppi (soitin): 1/4 tuumaa (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 tuumaa); RCA; USB; Langaton lähetin (sisäänrakennettu); XLR; Muu
pt-BR: Jack de saída tipo (instrumento): 1/4 pol. (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 pol.); RCA; USB; Transmissor sem fio (integrado); XLR; Outros
el: Τύπος υποδοχής εξόδου (όργανο): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Ασύρματος πομπός (ενσωματωμένος); XLR; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип изходен жак (инструмент): 1/4 инча (6,35 мм); 3,5 мм (1/8 инча); RCA; USB; Безжичен предавател (вграден); XLR; Друго
es: Tipo de conector de salida (instrumento): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Transmisor inalámbrico (incorporado); XLR; Otro
zh-TW: 輸出插孔類型（樂器）: 1/4 吋 (6.35 mm); 3.5 mm (1/8 吋); RCA; USB; 無線發射器 (內建); XLR; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de mufă de ieșire (instrument): 1/4 in (6,35 mm); 3,5 mm (1/8 in); RCA; USB; Transmițător wireless (încorporat); XLR; Altele